Tennessee statutes. Title 63 Professions Of The Healing Arts
Part 2 General Provisions
63-6-207. Application for certificate — Special training licenses — St. Jude Children's Research Hospital global collaboration license.

A person desiring to practice medicine or surgery in this state shall make application in writing to the board or via online application, which shall be accompanied by:

If a United States or Canadian medical school graduate:

A certificate from a medical school whose curriculum is approved by the American Medical Association or its extant accreditation program for medical education, or its successor;

A nonrefundable application fee as set by the board and by an examination fee prescribed in this section;

Evidence of the satisfactory completion of:

A one-year United States training program approved by the American Medical Association or its extant accreditation program for medical education, or its successor; or

A primary specialty training program that is accredited by the Royal College of Physicians and Surgeons of Canada and that is of a duration of not less than four (4) years;

Sufficient evidence of good moral character; and

Evidence of being legally entitled to live or work in the United States if the person is not a citizen of the United States or Canada;

If an international medical school graduate:

A certificate from a medical school whose curriculum is judged to be acceptable by the board;

A copy of a permanent Educational Commission for Foreign Medical Graduates (ECFMG) certificate;

A nonrefundable application fee as set by the board and by an examination fee prescribed in this section;

Sufficient evidence of good moral character;

Evidence of being a citizen of the United States or Canada, or legally entitled to live or work in the United States; and

Evidence of satisfactory completion of a three-year residency program approved by the American Medical Association or its extant accreditation program for medical education, or its successor. Such person may apply to the board for licensure and/or testing in accordance with this chapter within twelve (12) months of completion of the residency program if satisfactory performance in such residency is demonstrated to the satisfaction of the board.

All applicants shall present themselves before the board or the board's administrative designee for examination. The board may question in such subjects as the board may deem appropriate. As its qualifying examination, the board accepts the Federation Licensing Examination (FLEX), and/or the National Board of Medical Examiners examination and/or the United States Medical Licensing Examination or its successor examination. Applicants shall successfully complete the United States Medical Licensing Examination within ten (10) years from the date of whichever step of the examination was successfully completed first. An applicant is considered to have successfully completed a step of the examination on the date that the step was taken and not the date on which the passing score was made public by the examination agency; provided, however, that the board is authorized to promulgate rules and regulations creating exceptions that will extend the ten-year time frame provided in this subsection (b). In addition, the board reserves the right to write its own state board examination or contract with other national testing organizations. The board reserves the right to designate its administrative staff to administer the licensing examinations and to collect such application and examination fees as the board, in its discretion, may deem necessary.

The members of the board also have the right to examine all applicants in such oral examinations as they may deem necessary.

The board is authorized in its discretion to issue special training licenses to medical interns, residents and fellows who have met all other qualifications for licensure contained in this chapter and the rules and regulations promulgated pursuant thereto, with the exception of having completed the necessary residency or training programs required by subdivision (a)(1)(C) and/or (a)(2)(F) and the licensure examination. The board also is authorized to promulgate rules and regulations to implement this new licensure category. The initial set of these rules may be processed as emergency rules pursuant to the Uniform Administrative Procedures Act, compiled in title 4, chapter 5. These special training licenses will be governed by the following:

Such licenses shall be issued only to medical interns, residents and fellows while participating in a training program of one of the accredited medical schools or of one of such medical school's affiliated teaching hospitals in Tennessee, performing duties assigned to meet the requirements of such program, and while under the supervision and control of a physician fully licensed to practice medicine in Tennessee;

No person holding a special training license is permitted to practice medicine outside of such person's duties and responsibilities in the training program without being fully licensed to practice medicine in Tennessee. Termination of participation in the training program for which the special license was issued for any reason terminates that license;

It is the responsibility of the program director or the dean responsible for the training program to submit the necessary information and applications on behalf of each applicant. It also is the responsibility of the program director or the dean to notify the board of the termination of the applicant's participation in the training program, whether by completion of the program or for any other reason;

The board may impose fees to accompany each individual application for a special training license; and

Recipients of the special training license shall not be subject to the occupational tax levied by § 67-4-1702(3)(B);

Notwithstanding subdivision (d)(1), medical students, interns, residents, and clinical fellows who do not hold a special training license pursuant to this subsection (d) are exempt from the requirement of a license to practice medicine or surgery in this state when such medical students, interns, residents, and clinical fellows are participating in a training program of one (1) of the accredited medical schools or of one (1) of its affiliated teaching hospitals in this state, performing duties assigned to meet the requirements of the training program, and while under the supervision and control of a physician fully licensed to practice medicine or surgery in this state. No such student, intern, resident, or clinical fellow is permitted to practice medicine or surgery outside of the person's duties and responsibilities in the training program without being fully licensed to practice medicine or surgery in this state;

It is the responsibility of the program director or the dean responsible for the training program to apply to the board for an exemption for each such medical student, intern, resident, or clinical fellow. Moreover, it is the responsibility of such program director or dean to notify the board of the termination of the applicant's participation in the training program, whether by completion of the program or for any other reason;

The board may impose a fee to accompany each application for exemption;

Eligibility for the exemption provided for in this subdivision (d)(2) shall apply to all eligible persons in training on April 8, 1994, or thereafter.

The board or the board's designee is specifically authorized to conduct applicant interviews periodically as it deems necessary on a case by case basis.

The general assembly finds that St. Jude Children's Research Hospital is unique as a research center hospital in this state and this nation for protocol-based therapy and treatment of children and adolescents with newly diagnosed untreated or suspected cancer, HIV infections, or certain hematologic, immunologic, or genetic diseases. St. Jude Children's Research Hospital's experts are involved in research and treatment in the fields of hematology, oncology, bone marrow transplantation, immunology, genetic diseases and infectious diseases. The hospital's research involves both basic and clinical science and it is a National Cancer Institute Comprehensive Cancer Center. The general assembly finds that supporting research and treatment by qualified physicians and researchers at St. Jude Children's Research Hospital by means of a special St. Jude Children's Research Hospital global collaboration license would substantially benefit the state, the practice of medicine and the health of persons benefitting from treatment or research conducted at the hospital.

The board is authorized in its discretion to issue a special St. Jude Children's Research Hospital global collaboration license to physicians who have met all other qualifications for licensure contained in this chapter and the rules and regulation promulgated pursuant to this chapter, with the exception of having completed the necessary residency or training programs required by subdivision (a)(1)(C) or (a)(2)(F). The board is also authorized to promulgate rules and regulations to implement this new special licensure category.

These special St. Jude Children's Research Hospital global collaboration licenses will be governed by the following:

Such license shall be issued only to physicians while employed by St. Jude Children's Research Hospital;

No person holding a special St. Jude Children's Research Hospital global collaboration license is permitted to practice medicine outside of such person's duties and responsibilities as an employee of St. Jude Children's Hospital without being fully licensed to practice medicine in Tennessee. Termination of employment with St. Jude Children's Research Hospital for any reason terminates the special license;

It is the responsibility of St. Jude Children's Research Hospital to submit the necessary information and applications on behalf of each applicant. It is also the responsibility of St. Jude Children's Research Hospital to notify the board of the termination of the applicant's employment; and

The board may impose fees to accompany each individual application for this special license.

The board may issue a temporary license of limited duration to an international medical school graduate with demonstrated competency. A temporary license may be issued by the board in its discretion as special circumstances may require. The board may promulgate rules prescribing any other conditions or requirements with respect to the issuance of a temporary license pursuant to this subsection (g).

The board is authorized in its discretion to issue limited licenses to physicians who have been out of clinical practice for an extended period of time or who have been, or are at the time of their application, engaged exclusively in administrative medicine. The board may promulgate rules prescribing any other conditions or requirements with respect to the issuance of a limited license pursuant to this subsection (h).

Acts 1901, ch. 78, § 6; Shan., § 3609a18; Code 1932, § 6923; Acts 1945, ch. 181, § 3; C. Supp. 1950, § 6923; Acts 1975, ch. 355, § 14; impl. am. Acts 1976, ch. 575, § 1; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 63-611; Acts 1982, ch. 905, § 4; 1985, ch. 468, §§ 1, 2; 1988, ch. 912, § 1; 1989, ch. 302, § 1; 1989, ch. 523, §§ 41, 42; 1990, ch. 1002, § 1; 1990, ch. 1055, §§ 1, 3; 1993, ch. 404, § 8; 1994, ch. 732, § 2; 1995, ch. 97, §§ 1-3; 1995, ch. 329, § 1; 1998, ch. 877, § 1; 2003, ch. 11, § 1; 2004, ch. 562, § 1; 2006, ch. 774, §§ 1, 2; 2009, ch. 566, § 12; 2010, ch. 724, § 1; 2010, ch. 976, § 1; 2014, ch. 949, § 6; 2016, ch. 632, § 1; 2016, ch. 1035, §§ 1-7.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2009, ch. 566, § 12 provided that the Tennessee code commission is directed to change all references to public necessity rules, wherever such references appear in this code, to emergency rules, as sections are amended and volumes are replaced.

Acts 2016, ch. 1035, § 8 provided that notwithstanding the act or the Uniform Administrative Procedures Act, compiled in title 4, chapter 5, any rule promulgated to implement the provisions of the act shall be provided to the chairs of the health committee of the house of representatives and the health and welfare committee of the senate by the secretary of state, after approval by the attorney general and reporter, at the same time the text of the rule is made available to the government operations committees of the senate and the house of representatives for purposes of conducting the review required by § 4-5-226 in order for the health committee of the house of representatives and the health and welfare committee of the senate to be afforded the opportunity to comment on the rule.

Law Reviews.

Tennessee Civil Disabilities: A Systemic Approach (Neil P. Cohen), 41 Tenn. L. Rev. 253 (1974).

63-6-208. Exemption for physician for visiting sports team.

A physician who is duly qualified to practice medicine under the laws of another state is exempt from the licensure requirements of § 63-6-201, subject to this section, if either of the following applies:

The physician has a written or oral agreement with a sports team to provide care to team members and coaching staff traveling with the team for a specific sporting event to take place in this state; or

The physician has been invited by a national sport governing body to provide services to athletes and coaching staff at a national sport training center in this state or to provide services to athletes and coaching staff at an event or competition in this state that is sanctioned by the national sport governing body.

The exemption provided by this section only applies while:

The physician's practice is limited to that required by the team or the national sport governing body; and

The services provided by the physician are within the physician's scope of practice.

The exemption provided by subsection (a) permits a physician to provide care or consultation to a person specified in subsection (a). Nothing in this section permits a physician exempt by this section to:

Provide care or consultation to any person residing in this state other than a person specified in subsection (a); or

Practice at a licensed healthcare facility in this state.

An exemption pursuant to subdivision (a)(1) is valid while the physician is traveling with the sports team, subject to the following:

The exemption shall not be longer than ten (10) days in duration for each respective sporting event without prior authorization from the board of medical examiners;

The board of medical examiners may grant an extension of not more than twenty (20) additional days per sporting event; and

No physician shall be exempt for more than thirty (30) total days in a calendar year.

An exemption pursuant to subdivision (a)(2) is valid during the time certified by the national sport governing body; however, no physician shall be exempt for more than thirty (30) total days in a calendar year.

No physician exempt pursuant to this section shall dispense or administer controlled substances unless:

The patient to whom the controlled substance is administered or dispensed is over eighteen (18) years of age and is a person described in subdivision (a)(1) or (a)(2); and

The physician reports all controlled substances dispensed or administered to any applicable state controlled substance database in the physician's state of licensure.

For purposes of this section, “sports team” means a professional, semi-professional, or amateur team including, but not limited to, a college, high school, grade school, or non-school affiliated team, such as those associated with the Amateur Athletic Union (AAU).

The board of medical examiners may enter into agreements with medical licensing boards of other states to implement this section. Agreements may include procedures for reporting potential medical license violations.

The board of medical examiners may promulgate rules to effectuate the purposes of this section. The rules shall be promulgated in accordance with the Uniform Administrative Procedures Act, compiled in title 4, chapter 5.

Acts 2017, ch. 329, § 2.

Compiler's Notes. Former § 63-6-208 (Acts 1901, ch. 78, § 7; Shan., § 3609a20; Code 1932, § 6925; Acts 1945, ch. 181, § 5; C. Supp. 1950, § 6925; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 63-612; Acts 1982, ch. 905, § 5; 1984, ch. 937, § 30; 1989, ch. 523, § 43), concerning examinations of applicants for medical licenses, was repealed by Acts 1993, ch. 404, § 9, effective May 19, 1993.

Acts 2017, ch. 329, § 1 provided that the act, which enacted this section, shall be known and may be cited as the “Visiting Sports Team Act.”

Effective Dates. Acts 2017, ch. 329, § 4. January 1, 2018; provided, that for the purpose of promulgating rules, the act took effect May 9, 2017.

63-6-209. Issue of licenses.

Licenses shall be issued promptly by the division as directed by the board after the board determines that an applicant has met all licensure criteria or qualifications and successfully passed the examination. The board shall also issue to such applicant a certificate of registration signed by the administrator of the health related boards, which certificate shall recite that the person is duly registered for the years specified.

The board also has the authority to issue locum tenens and/or conditional licenses as it deems appropriate after reviewing the qualifications of applicants. In addition to the authority granted the board in § 63-6-214, the board has the authority to issue restricted licenses and special licenses based upon licensure to another state for the limited purpose of authorizing the practice of telemedicine to current applicants or current licensees, or both, as it deems necessary, pursuant to the Uniform Administrative Procedures Act, compiled in title 4, chapter 5.

Any certificate of registration issued by the board shall contain the name of the person to whom it is issued, the address of the person, the date and number of the license and such other information as the board deems necessary. The address contained on this certificate of registration shall be the address of the licensee where all correspondence and renewal forms from the board shall be sent during the two (2) years for which the certificate of registration has been issued and shall be the address deemed sufficient for purposes of service of process.

Any licensee whose address changes from the address contained on the registration certificate shall, within thirty (30) days thereafter, notify the board of the address change.

Acts 1901, ch. 78, § 11; Shan., § 3609a24; Code 1932, § 6928; Acts 1945, ch. 181, § 6; impl. am. Acts 1947, ch. 9, §§ 2-4, 9; C. Supp. 1950, § 6928; Acts 1953, ch. 113, § 15; 1961, ch. 114, § 1; 1972, ch. 587, § 1; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 63-613; Acts 1984, ch. 937, § 31; 1985, ch. 48, § 1; T.C.A., § 63-6-210(a); Acts 1993, ch. 404, § 10; 1996, ch. 1043, § 3.

Cross-References. Issuance of licenses, § 63-1-104.

63-6-210. Renewal of licenses — Retirement — Inactive status — Comparison and sharing of information with the Tennessee Medical Association

Each person licensed to practice medicine in this state shall, pursuant to the renewal system established in subsection (b), biennially apply to the board for a renewal of licensure and shall pay a renewal fee as set by the board. Each application shall be made on a form to be furnished by the board and sent to the licensee well in advance of the scheduled renewal date. The board shall, in its discretion, absent receipt of derogatory information, renew licensure upon application made in due form and upon payment of all required fees and shall issue a new biennial registration certificate.

There is hereby authorized the establishment of a system of license renewals at alternative intervals that will allow for the distribution of the license workload as uniformly as is practicable throughout the calendar year. Licenses issued under this renewal system are valid for twenty-four (24) months and shall expire on the last day of the last month of the license period. However, during any transition period, or at any time thereafter when the board shall determine that the volume of work for any given interval is unduly burdensome or costly, either the licenses or renewals, or both, may be issued for terms of not less than six (6) months nor more than eighteen (18) months. The fee imposed for any license under any renewal system for a period of other than twenty-four (24) months shall be proportionate to the biennial fee and modified in no other manner, except that the proportional fee shall be rounded off to the nearest quarter of a dollar (25¢).

A licensee may renew a license within sixty (60) days following the license expiration date upon payment of the renewal fee in addition to a late penalty established by the board for each month or fraction of a month that payment for renewal is late; provided that the late penalty shall not exceed twice the renewal fee. When any licensee fails to renew a license and pay the biennial renewal fee within sixty (60) days after renewal becomes due, as provided in this section, the license shall be automatically revoked at the expiration of sixty (60) days after the renewal was required without further notice or hearing.

Any licensee whose license is automatically revoked as provided in subsection (b), may apply in writing to the board for reinstatement of such license, which may be granted by the board upon the payment of all past due fees and reinstatement fees established by the board, and upon further conditions as the board may require.

Any person licensed to practice by this chapter who has retired or may hereafter retire from practice in this state shall not be made to register as required by this chapter if such person shall file with this board an affidavit of retirement form furnished by the board. The affidavit shall state the date on which the person retired from practice and such other facts as shall tend to verify such retirement as the board shall deem necessary. If the person thereafter wishes to reenter practice in this state, the person shall apply for licensure reactivation with the board, pay a reactivation fee as set by the board and shall meet such other reasonable requirements as may be deemed necessary by the board.

The board shall have the authority to create a renewable inactive licensure status as it deems appropriate upon payment of an appropriate fee assessment and compliance with the requirements established by the board for those licensees who actively practice medicine in a state other than Tennessee.

In order to ensure that the board has the most recent and accurate data on licensees and applicants for licensure within this state, the board shall cooperate with the Tennessee Medical Association by comparing and sharing computer data bases and other physician identification file information, including, without limitation, license numbers, medical education numbers, social security numbers, home and business address information and any other data of a similar, nonconfidential nature, for a reasonable charge.

Acts 1901, ch. 78, § 8; Shan., § 3609a21; mod. Code 1932, § 6926; impl. am. Acts 1947, ch. 9, §§ 2-4, 9; C. Supp. 1950, § 6926; Acts 1976, ch. 473, § 1; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 63-614; Acts 1984, ch. 937, § 32; 1986, ch. 675, § 5; 1989, ch. 360, §§ 23, 24; 1989, ch. 523, §§ 44, 45; 1993, ch. 404, § 11; 1996, ch. 1043, § 4; 2010, ch. 1043, § 9.

Compiler's Notes. Former § 63-6-210(a) was transferred to § 63-6-209 in 1986.

Cross-References. Confidentiality of public records, § 10-7-504.

License renewals, § 63-1-107.

Retirement, § 63-1-111.

63-6-211. Licensure of out-of-state and international applicants.

The board is authorized to accept the certificates of licensure from other states as long as the applicant's certificates and qualifications meet or exceed the requirements set forth in § 63-6-207 and the rules promulgated pursuant thereto.

The board is likewise authorized to accept certificates of license from other states or countries and grant licenses to practice medicine in Tennessee to individuals who, at the sole discretion of the board based upon its examination and evaluation of such individuals' credentials, qualifications and reputation within the medical community, qualify as distinguished faculty members at a rank of full professor and upon application and payment of a nonrefundable licensure fee as determined by the board. This type of license shall authorize the practice of medicine in conjunction with a faculty appointment and shall automatically expire at any time the licensee fails to maintain a full-time appointment. The board shall retain the sole discretionary authority to grant or deny annual renewal of such licenses. To be considered for licensure pursuant to this subsection (b), an individual must meet each of the following minimum criteria:

Possess a degree of doctor of medicine or its equivalent;

Have a full-time appointment at professorial rank at an accredited college of medicine in Tennessee;

Have current membership in good standing in medical specialty societies that have restricted and selective membership;

Have been invited to be a lecturer or visiting professor at medical educational institutions either abroad or within the United States;

Have delivered scholarly medical papers before national or international meetings; and

Possess letters of support from the dean of the appointing college of medicine and its appropriate department chairs, as well as from academic colleagues from outside of Tennessee attesting to the individual's distinguished status.

For purposes of enforcing federal immigration laws which relate to the licensure of foreign physicians in this state, the board of medical examiners shall enter into a written agreement, in accordance with federal and other applicable law, between the board and the United States department of homeland security concerning the enforcement of federal immigration laws, which may include participation in the federal systematic alien verification of entitlements program, referred to as the “SAVE program,” and its verification information system, operated by the United States department of homeland security or a successor program designated by the United States department of homeland security or any additional certifying agent within the department or approved by the department.

Acts 1907, ch. 543, § 3; Shan., § 3609a19; Code 1932, § 6924; Acts 1945, ch. 181, § 4; impl. am. Acts 1947, ch. 9, §§ 2-4, 9; C. Supp. 1950, § 6924; Acts 1953, ch. 113, § 14; 1961, ch. 114, § 2; 1972, ch. 587, § 2; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 63-615; Acts 1989, ch. 523, §§ 46, 47; 1991, ch. 429, § 1; 1993, ch. 404, § 12; 1994, ch. 732, § 4; 2010, ch. 1122, § 1.

63-6-212. Records.

The board shall keep a record of their proceedings in a book provided for that purpose, which book shall be open for inspection and shall record the name of each applicant, the time of granting a license and the names of the members of the board present. Where a license is denied by the board to any applicant under authority of this chapter, the fact and ground of such denial shall be entered on the minutes of the board and shall be communicated in writing to such applicant.

Acts 1901, ch. 78, § 10; Shan., § 3609a23; Code 1932, § 6927; impl. am. Acts 1947, ch. 9, §§ 2-4, 9; C. Supp. 1950, § 6927; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 63-616; Acts 1984, ch. 937, § 33.

63-6-213. Investigation and prosecution of violations — Injunctions — Contested cases.

The members of the board shall investigate any supposed violation of this chapter and report to the proper district attorney general all the cases that in the judgment of such member or members warrant prosecution.

It is the duty of the district attorneys general to prosecute violators of this chapter.

The board may, through the department of health's general counsel, petition any circuit or chancery court having jurisdiction over any person within this state who is practicing medicine without a license or in violation of a restriction or condition placed upon a license, regardless of whether such practice resulted from a license being restricted, conditioned, denied, or because a license has been suspended or revoked by action of the board, or any other reason, to enjoin such person from conducting or continuing to conduct the unlawful practice of medicine within this state.

Jurisdiction is conferred upon the circuit and chancery courts of this state to hear and determine all such causes as equity causes and are authorized to exercise full and complete jurisdiction in these injunctive proceedings. Nothing in this section shall be construed as conferring criminal jurisdiction upon any court not now possessing such criminal jurisdiction, nor shall any such court, as an incident to the injunctive proceedings authorized in this section, have the power to assess criminal penalties.

The board shall retain rulemaking authority to adjust the administration of its contested case docket in order to provide for the efficient and orderly disposition of contested cases. This authority may include rulemaking for the setting of reasonable limitations on deadlines for case settlements, and whether several contested cases are set on each meeting's docket of business.

Acts 1901, ch. 78, § 21; Shan., § 3609a35; mod. Code 1932, § 6939; Acts 1945, ch. 181, § 11; C. Supp. 1950, § 6939; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 63-617; Acts 1996, ch. 1043, § 5.

Cross-References. Enjoining violations, § 63-1-121.

Law Reviews.

The Tennessee Court Systems — Prosecution, 8 Mem. St. L. Rev. 477.